Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142D.085] PARENT NOTIFICATION; TYPE 1 DIABETES INFORMATION. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioners of health and education, must develop informational materials on type 1 diabetes for parents of children in preschool programs. By October 1, 2025, the materials must be posted on the department's website. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, school districts and charter schools that offer preschool programs must provide the materials developed under this section to parents with children in any preschool program. School districts and charter schools must disseminate the materials at least once each school year. new text end new text begin (c) The informational materials developed under this section must include, but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a description of type 1 diabetes; new text end new text begin (2) a description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes; new text end new text begin (3) a recommendation for parents of children displaying warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes to consult with the child's primary care provider to determine if immediate screening for type 1 diabetes is appropriate; new text end new text begin (4) a description of the screening process for type 1 diabetes and the implications of test results; and new text end new text begin (5) a recommendation that, following a type 1 diabetes diagnosis, parents should consult with the child's primary care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan, which may include consultation with and examination by a specialty care provider, including but not limited to an endocrinologist. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, a "preschool program" means a school readiness program under sections 142D.05 and 142D.06, a school readiness plus program under section 142D.07, and a voluntary prekindergarten program under section 142D.08. new text end